Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB786.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Paul T. Sucevic Memorial Bridge.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Paul T. Sucevic was born September 2, 1930.(2) After earning a Bachelor of Science in Mathematics from Saint Vincent College and a Bachelor of Science in Civil Engineering from the Carnegie Institute of Technology, now the Carnegie Mellon University College of Engineering, Mr. Sucevic began his professional engineering career designing bridges in Pennsylvania in the late 1950s.(3) Throughout his career, Mr. Sucevic actively engaged with the American Society of Highway Engineers Southwest Penn and worked for leading engineering design firms such as 12345678910111213141516171819 Westmoreland Engineering and Fayette Engineering, as well as the Department of Transportation.(4) In 1981, Mr. Sucevic cofounded Sucevic, Piccolomini & Kuchar (SPK) Engineering, Inc., in Uniontown, where he served as President, Lead Bridge Designer and mentor to many aspiring civil engineers.(5) Since its inception, SPK Engineering, Inc., has designed hundreds of bridges across Pennsylvania. Under Mr. Sucevic's leadership, the company has led the way in bridge and roadway innovation, earning several awards. Notably, the firm received the 1993 Prize Bridge Award from the American Institute of Steel Construction, Inc., for the Belle Vernon Bridge on Interstate 70, the 1997 Pennsylvania Quality Initiative Award for Community Support and Customer Focus for the Peach Street Corridor, U.S. Route 19, roadway improvements in Erie County, the 1998 Pennsylvania Quality Initiative Structure Award for the Cucumber Run Bridge on State Route 2019 in Fayette County, the 2003 Congestion Management Award from the Pennsylvania Partnership for Highway Quality for the Pennsylvania Route 18 Widening Project in Mercer County and the 2006 Civil Engineering Achievement Award from the American Society of Civil Engineers, Pittsburgh Section, for the Erie Bayfront Connector Highway Project.(6) However, one of Mr. Sucevic's more complex projects was the 1996 replacement of the Pennsylvania Route 381 bridge over Meadow Run in Ohiopyle. This project showcased his expertise due to its challenging design, narrow highway conditions, span length, underclearance height and the necessity to maintain continuous traffic flow.20250SB0786PN0839 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (7) Drawing on his expertise in bridge stability, load-bearing capacity, durability and cost-effectiveness, Mr. Sucevic chose a three-span bridge arrangement with two piers, each featuring a dual-column arched support structure, and bridge deck supported by prestressed concrete I-beams.(8) The contractor, Paliotta Construction, skillfully built the structure according to Mr. Sucevic's design, which seamlessly blended the surrounding natural aesthetics with functionality. Since its construction, the bridge has consistently provided safe passage for motorists, cyclists and pedestrians traveling to and from Ohiopyle State Park.(9) Mr. Sucevic retired from SPK Engineering, Inc., in 2007 and passed away peacefully on November 8, 2021. He is remembered by many as a man of quiet strength, integrity and grace, never compromising on his work. Mr. Sucevic's legacy of uncompromising quality and service endures through both his predecessors and the engineers he inspired.(10) In recognition of Mr. Sucevic's dedication to excellence in bridge design and his influential mentorship that helped shape Pennsylvania's infrastructure and inspired countless engineers, it is fitting that the bridge he designed be named in his honor.(b) Designation.--The bridge, identified as Bridge Key 16676, carrying Pennsylvania Route 381 over Meadow Run in the Borough of Ohiopyle, Fayette County, is designated as the Paul T. Sucevic Memorial Bridge.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the bridge to traffic in both directions on the bridge.Section 2. Effective date.20250SB0786PN0839 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0786PN0839 - 4 - 1